Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-715
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the protection of natural diversity promotes the quality of life for Nebraska residents and their descendents and the protection of natural areas maintains species and their genetic diversity for economic development and human benefit. The Legislature further finds and declares that specific knowledge of the status and location of natural heritage resources and their recognition can prevent needless conflict with economic development and voluntary cooperation of landowners is an effective and cost-efficient means to protect significant natural resources.

Laws 1989, LB 251, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1401;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 329.